FOMA_Scripts/fullgerman.lexc
LEXICON NFem_0_e
Causa    NFem_0_eSPinf;
Mamma    NFem_0_eSPinf;
Media    NFem_0_eSPinf;
Missa    NFem_0_eSPinf;
Persona    NFem_0_eSPinf;
Wehr    NFem_0_eSPinf;
Causa    NFem_0_eSPinf;

LEXICON NFem_0_eSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural:^e #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural:^e #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural:^e #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural:^e #;

LEXICON NFem_0_enSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural:^en #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural:^en #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural:^en #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural:^en #;

LEXICON  NFem_0_nSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural:^n #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural:^n #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural:^n #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural:^n #;

LEXICON NFem_0_sSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural:^s #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural:^s #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural:^s #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural:^s #;


LEXICON NMasc-ns
Buchstabe    NMasc-nsSPinf;
Friede    NMasc-nsSPinf;
Funke    NMasc-nsSPinf;
Gedanke    NMasc-nsSPinf;
Glaube    NMasc-nsSPinf;
Name    NMasc-nsSPinf;
Roche    NMasc-nsSPinf;
Same    NMasc-nsSPinf;
Schade    NMasc-nsSPinf;
Wille    NMasc-nsSPinf;
Wille    NMasc-nsSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc-nsSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:^n  #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^ns #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:^n #;

LEXICON NMasc-s/$sse
Abfluss    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Abschluss    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Aderlass    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Anlass    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Anschluss    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Aufschluss    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Ausschuss    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Bass    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Überschuss    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Beschluss    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Beschuss    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Einfluss    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Einlass    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Einschluss    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Entschluss    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Genuss    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Kuss    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Nachlass    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Pass    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Rückschluss    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Schluss    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Schluss    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Vorschuss    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Zuschuss    NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;
Vorschuss     NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc-s/$sseSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:^e #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:+um^e #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:+um^e #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:+um^en #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:+um^e #;

LEXICON NMasc-s/sse
Abriss    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Airbus    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Atlas    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Biss    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Boss    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Bonus    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Bus    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Circus    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Diskus    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Erlass    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Exodus    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Exzess    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Fokus    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Fundus    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Ibis    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Imbiss    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Kaktus    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Koloss    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Kompass    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Kompromiss    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Kongress    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Korpus    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Kürbis    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Nimbus    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Obolus    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Omnibus    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Penis    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Prozess    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Rausschmiss    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Riss    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Städteatlas    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Turnus    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Umriss    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Zirkus    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;
Turnus    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc-s/sseSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:+um^se #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:+um^se #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:+um^sen #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:+um^se #;

LEXICON NMasc-us/en
Algorithmus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Anachronismus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Aphorismus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Diskus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Egoismus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Fötus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Genius    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Globus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Hymnus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Individualismus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Klassizismus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Konus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Kubus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Mechanismus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Mimus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Mythus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Nuntius    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Ordinarius    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Organismus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Orgasmus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Primarius    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Radius    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Rhythmus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Ritus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Sarkasmus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Tropus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Vandalismus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Zyklus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Zynismus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;
Zyklus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc-us/enSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:-us^en #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:-us^en #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:-us^en #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:-us^en #;

LEXICON NMasc-us/i
Campus    NMasc-us/iSPinf;
Christus    NMasc-us/iSPinf;
Gestus    NMasc-us/iSPinf;
Modus    NMasc-us/iSPinf;
Numerus    NMasc-us/iSPinf;
Primus    NMasc-us/iSPinf;
Terminus    NMasc-us/iSPinf;
Tonus    NMasc-us/iSPinf;
Terminus    NMasc-us/iSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc-us/iSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:-us^i #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:-us^i #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:-us^i #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:-us^i #;

LEXICON NMasc/Sg_0SPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:0 #;

LEXICON NMasc/Sg_esSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:e #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:es #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:s #;

LEXICON NMasc/Sg_sSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:s #;

LEXICON NMasc_0_x
Böller    NMasc_0_xSPinf;
Champion    NMasc_0_xSPinf;
Cox    NMasc_0_xSPinf;
Cross    NMasc_0_xSPinf;
Ecu    NMasc_0_xSPinf;
Eros    NMasc_0_xSPinf;
Gams    NMasc_0_xSPinf;
Groschen    NMasc_0_xSPinf;
Jus    NMasc_0_xSPinf;
Kasus    NMasc_0_xSPinf;
Limes    NMasc_0_xSPinf;
Lotus    NMasc_0_xSPinf;
Marquis    NMasc_0_xSPinf;
Parcours    NMasc_0_xSPinf;
Passus    NMasc_0_xSPinf;
Prix    NMasc_0_xSPinf;
Samurai    NMasc_0_xSPinf;
Strip    NMasc_0_xSPinf;
Unwille    NMasc_0_xSPinf;
Zulu    NMasc_0_xSPinf;
Prix    NMasc_0_xSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc_0_xSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:0 #;

LEXICON NMasc_en_enSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:^en #;

LEXICON NMasc_es_$eSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:^e #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:+um^e #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:+um^e #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:+um^en #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:+um^e #;

LEXICON NMasc_es_$er
Aas    NMasc_es_$erSPinf;
Ammann    NMasc_es_$erSPinf;
Baumblatt    NMasc_es_$erSPinf;
Bloch    NMasc_es_$erSPinf;
Gartengott    NMasc_es_$erSPinf;
Gehalt    NMasc_es_$erSPinf;
Geschmack    NMasc_es_$erSPinf;
Gott    NMasc_es_$erSPinf;
Hauptmann    NMasc_es_$erSPinf;
Innenrand    NMasc_es_$erSPinf;
Irrtum    NMasc_es_$erSPinf;
Kaufmann    NMasc_es_$erSPinf;
Mann    NMasc_es_$erSPinf;
Mund    NMasc_es_$erSPinf;
Obmann    NMasc_es_$erSPinf;
Ombudsmann    NMasc_es_$erSPinf;
Rand    NMasc_es_$erSPinf;
Reichtum    NMasc_es_$erSPinf;
Schoss    NMasc_es_$erSPinf;
Strauch    NMasc_es_$erSPinf;
Wald    NMasc_es_$erSPinf;
Wurm    NMasc_es_$erSPinf;
Rand     NMasc_es_$erSPinf;

LEXICON NFem_0_n
Blockade    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Eucharistie    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Handhabe    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Klemme    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Massage    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Partisane    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Robe    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Sperre    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Urne    NFem_0_nSPinf;
LEXICON NMasc_en_en
Astronaut    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Bolid    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Delinquent    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Evangelist    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Galerist    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Hinduist    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Kommandant    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Narr    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Prokurist    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Stipendiat    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
LEXICON NFem_0_en
Ambition    NFem_0_enSPinf;
Artistik    NFem_0_enSPinf;
Autorität    NFem_0_enSPinf;
Bestellung    NFem_0_enSPinf;
Deklaration    NFem_0_enSPinf;
Dokumentation    NFem_0_enSPinf;
Entspannung    NFem_0_enSPinf;
Exposition    NFem_0_enSPinf;
Gemeinschaft    NFem_0_enSPinf;
Information    NFem_0_enSPinf;
Koloratur    NFem_0_enSPinf;
Lebensform    NFem_0_enSPinf;
Mobilisierung    NFem_0_enSPinf;
Pflicht    NFem_0_enSPinf;
Reform    NFem_0_enSPinf;
Schlacht    NFem_0_enSPinf;
Sucht    NFem_0_enSPinf;
Verleumdung    NFem_0_enSPinf;
Wohltat    NFem_0_enSPinf;
LEXICON NFem_0_n
Amphibie    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Börse    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Ferne    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Hingabe    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Kralle    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Möhre    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Philologie    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Schale    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Strapaze    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Waise    NFem_0_nSPinf;
LEXICON NFem_0_s
Banja    NFem_0_sSPinf;
Cafeteria    NFem_0_sSPinf;
Coca    NFem_0_sSPinf;
Conte    NFem_0_sSPinf;
Coupe    NFem_0_sSPinf;
Disc    NFem_0_sSPinf;
Domain    NFem_0_sSPinf;
Fashion    NFem_0_sSPinf;
Gaudi    NFem_0_sSPinf;
Harmonika    NFem_0_sSPinf;
Jury    NFem_0_sSPinf;
Krem    NFem_0_sSPinf;
Lobby    NFem_0_sSPinf;
Madame    NFem_0_sSPinf;
Oma    NFem_0_sSPinf;
Pipeline    NFem_0_sSPinf;
Saga    NFem_0_sSPinf;
Single    NFem_0_sSPinf;
Website    NFem_0_sSPinf;
LEXICON NMasc/Sg_0
Atlas    NMasc/Sg_0SPinf;
Birthday    NMasc/Sg_0SPinf;
Cannabis    NMasc/Sg_0SPinf;
Codex    NMasc/Sg_0SPinf;
Demos    NMasc/Sg_0SPinf;
Erlös    NMasc/Sg_0SPinf;
Faschismus    NMasc/Sg_0SPinf;
Forint    NMasc/Sg_0SPinf;
Immobilismus    NMasc/Sg_0SPinf;
Kodex    NMasc/Sg_0SPinf;
Kursus    NMasc/Sg_0SPinf;
Mythos    NMasc/Sg_0SPinf;
Parlamentarismus    NMasc/Sg_0SPinf;
Pragmatismus    NMasc/Sg_0SPinf;
Rassismus    NMasc/Sg_0SPinf;
Segen    NMasc/Sg_0SPinf;
Stalinismus    NMasc/Sg_0SPinf;
Totalitarismus    NMasc/Sg_0SPinf;
Yoga    NMasc/Sg_0SPinf;
LEXICON NMasc/Sg_es
Anwachs    NMasc/Sg_esSPinf;
Ausbau    NMasc/Sg_esSPinf;
Überdruss    NMasc/Sg_esSPinf;
Buddhismus    NMasc/Sg_esSPinf;
Enthusiasmus    NMasc/Sg_esSPinf;
Fleiss    NMasc/Sg_esSPinf;
Gehorsam    NMasc/Sg_esSPinf;
Harm    NMasc/Sg_esSPinf;
Kitsch    NMasc/Sg_esSPinf;
Lärm    NMasc/Sg_esSPinf;
Mut    NMasc/Sg_esSPinf;
Rauch    NMasc/Sg_esSPinf;
Schneid    NMasc/Sg_esSPinf;
Splitt    NMasc/Sg_esSPinf;
Stress    NMasc/Sg_esSPinf;
Ultraschall    NMasc/Sg_esSPinf;
Verfall    NMasc/Sg_esSPinf;
Voyeurismus    NMasc/Sg_esSPinf;
Kren    NMasc/Sg_esSPinf;
LEXICON NMasc/Sg_s
Amok    NMasc/Sg_sSPinf;
Bau    NMasc/Sg_sSPinf;
Blödsinn    NMasc/Sg_sSPinf;
Charme    NMasc/Sg_sSPinf;
Deut    NMasc/Sg_sSPinf;
Februar    NMasc/Sg_sSPinf;
Haber    NMasc/Sg_sSPinf;
Hot    NMasc/Sg_sSPinf;
Klee    NMasc/Sg_sSPinf;
Lew    NMasc/Sg_sSPinf;
Mörtel    NMasc/Sg_sSPinf;
Plural    NMasc/Sg_sSPinf;
Rückzieher    NMasc/Sg_sSPinf;
Saldo    NMasc/Sg_sSPinf;
Schwefel    NMasc/Sg_sSPinf;
Striptease    NMasc/Sg_sSPinf;
Urin    NMasc/Sg_sSPinf;
Vorschein    NMasc/Sg_sSPinf;
Bien    NMasc/Sg_sSPinf;
LEXICON NMasc_en_en
Anarchist    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Cellist    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Faschist    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Immigrant    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Ökonom    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Organist    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Präsident    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Technokrat    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
LEXICON NMasc_es_$e
Admiral    NMasc_es_$eSPinf;
Ansturm    NMasc_es_$eSPinf;
Auftrag    NMasc_es_$eSPinf;
Auszug    NMasc_es_$eSPinf;
Überschwang    NMasc_es_$eSPinf;
Bypass    NMasc_es_$eSPinf;
Einfluss    NMasc_es_$eSPinf;
Empfang    NMasc_es_$eSPinf;
Frosch    NMasc_es_$eSPinf;
Grund    NMasc_es_$eSPinf;
Kamm    NMasc_es_$eSPinf;
Kranz    NMasc_es_$eSPinf;
Nachschub    NMasc_es_$eSPinf;
Rang    NMasc_es_$eSPinf;
Schrank    NMasc_es_$eSPinf;
Strom    NMasc_es_$eSPinf;
Unfall    NMasc_es_$eSPinf;
Wasserstand    NMasc_es_$eSPinf;
